Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.090

Home detention or electronic monitoring—Conditions.

A monitoring agency, as defined in RCW 9.94A.736, may not agree to monitor pursuant to home detention or electronic monitoring an offender who is currently awaiting trial for a violent or sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, unless the defendant's release before trial is secured with a payment of bail. If bail is revoked by the court or the bail bond agency, the court shall note the reason for the revocation in the court file.

[ 2015 c 287 s 12.]